Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 3

Arkansas Agricultural Foreign Investment

2-3-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Agricultural Foreign Investment Act”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2201.

2-3-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural land” means any Arkansas land which is outside the corporate limits of a municipality and is used or capable, without substantial modification to the character of the land, of use for agricultural, forestry, or timber production, but does not include oil, gas, and all other minerals, including coal, lignite, brine, and all minerals known and recognized as commercial minerals underlying the land;

“Foreign government” means any government other than the federal government or any government of a state or a political subdivision of a state;

“Foreign party” means:

Any individual who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not a resident of some state, territory, or possession of the United States;

Any foreign government;

Any party, other than an individual or a government, which is created or organized under the laws of a foreign government or which has its principal place of business located outside the United States;

Any party other than an individual or a government:

Which is created or organized under the laws of any state; and

In which a significant interest is directly or indirectly held or in which not insubstantial control is directly or indirectly held or is capable of being exercised by:

Any individual referred to in subdivision (3)(A) of this section;

Any foreign government;

Any party referred to in subdivision (3)(C) of this section;

Any combination of such individuals, parties, or government; and

Any agent, trustee, or other fiduciary of a person or entity enumerated in this subdivision (3); and

“Party” means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, society, joint-stock company, trust, estate, or any other legal entity.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2202.

2-3-103. Registration of foreign interest in agricultural land.

(1)(A)When after April 19, 1979, any foreign party acquires any interest in agricultural land in Arkansas by grant, purchase, adverse possession, devise, descent, or in any other manner or any agent, trustee, or fiduciary acquires title to agricultural land in Arkansas on behalf of a foreign party, the foreign party or agent, trustee, or fiduciary shall register the ownership in the office of the circuit clerk in the county in which the land is located within sixty (60) days after the acquisition.

The registration shall include a description of the agricultural lands acquired and the name and business address of the foreign party which acquired the lands or in whose behalf the lands were acquired.

When the acquisition of lands by a foreign party is registered with the circuit clerk as required in this section, the clerk shall record the acquisition in an appropriate foreign land ownership record book to be maintained by him or her. The clerk shall forthwith remit a copy of the registration to the Secretary of State, who shall likewise maintain a record of all registrations made under the provisions of this chapter.

Any foreign party who obtains a lease of agricultural land for a term of ten (10) years or longer or a lease renewable by option for terms which, if the options were all exercised, would total ten (10) years shall be deemed to have acquired agricultural land within the meaning of this chapter.

Any party who acquires or holds any interest in agricultural land in violation of this chapter shall continue to violate this chapter for as long as he or she holds an interest in the land.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a foreign party holding a lien or other interest in agricultural land before April 19, 1979, from taking a valid title to the land by the enforcement of the lien or other existing interest, but any such interest shall be registered as required in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2203.

2-3-104. Right to security interests.

Any foreign party shall have the right to make loans of money and to take and accept mortgages or other security interests upon agricultural land in Arkansas to secure the payment of loans. The foreign party may acquire fee ownership of the land upon a foreclosure or other legal enforcement of the security interest, provided the foreign party acquiring ownership registers the ownership as required in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2204.

2-3-105. Land acquired by lien.

Any foreign party who acquires agricultural land by enforcement of a lien resulting from a transaction occurring after April 19, 1979, shall, within sixty (60) days of the acquisition, register the ownership as required in this chapter.

In the event of failure to register as required in this chapter, proceedings under § 2-3-106 or § 2-3-107 shall be commenced.

If the court finds that the agricultural land has been acquired or is held in violation of this chapter, the court shall enter a declaratory judgment of the violation and order that the agricultural land be divested to a party other than another foreign party within two (2) years of the date of the order.

The court may also assess against the foreign party a civil penalty for a knowing violation of this chapter of up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the then fair market value of the agricultural land.

The penalty assessed shall become a lien against the agricultural land.

Upon the entry of a declaratory judgment of a violation and an order of divestiture, the Attorney General shall cause a copy of the order to be filed with the recorder of deeds of each county in which any portion of the agricultural land is located.

The order of divestiture shall be a covenant running with the agricultural land against any foreign party, grantee, or assignee.

Any foreign party who shall acquire any portion of the agricultural land within the two-year divestiture period specified in the order shall be required to divest within the two-year period.

Any agricultural land which is not divested within the time prescribed by an order under subsection (c) of this section shall be ordered sold at public sale in the manner prescribed by law for the foreclosure of a mortgage on real estate for default in payment.

Publisher's Notes. Pursuant to §14-14-1301, the clerk of the circuit court is ex officio recorder.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (b)(1) inserted “or her”, substituted “Pulaski County Circuit Court” for “Circuit Court or Chancery Court of Pulaski County”, and deleted “or chancery” following “circuit”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2211.

2-3-106. Proceedings upon failure to register.

Any recorder of deeds, tax assessor, or other public official who shall learn that a foreign party has acquired agricultural land in Arkansas after April 19, 1979, and has not registered as required in this chapter or otherwise holds agricultural land in violation of this chapter shall report the violation to the Attorney General.

(1)Upon receiving notice under subsection (a) of this section, or otherwise in his or her discretion, the Attorney General shall institute an action in the Pulaski County Circuit Court or in the circuit court of any county in which any portion of the agricultural land acquired or held in violation of §2-3-103 is located.

The Attorney General shall file a notice of the pendency of the action with the recorder of deeds of each county in which any portion of the agricultural land is located.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2205; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 2.

2-3-107. Private right of enforcement.

If the Attorney General refuses to bring an action provided for or authorized by this chapter, any person claiming a violation therefor, upon notice to the Attorney General, may apply to the court for leave to bring the action in his or her own name and may bring the action if leave therefor is granted.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2206.

2-3-108. Exceptions generally.

This chapter shall not apply to agricultural land owned by a foreign party on April 19, 1979, while the land is held by the foreign party, nor shall this chapter apply to any alien while a bona fide resident of the United States or one of its territories or possessions.

Should any alien owning agricultural land in Arkansas cease to be a bona fide resident of the United States or one of its territories or possessions, the alien shall register as required in this chapter within two (2) years after ceasing to be a bona fide resident.

Agricultural land held by a nonresident alien over two (2) years after ceasing to be a resident alien shall be subject to the proceedings set forth in §§ 2-3-106 and 2-3-107.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2207.

2-3-109. Rights in nonfarm lands.

Except as provided in this chapter, all aliens, whether or not residents of the United States, shall be capable of acquiring by grant, purchase, adverse possession, devise, or descent any interest in any real estate except agricultural land, as defined in §2-3-102, and of owning, holding, devising, or alienating it and shall incur the like duties and liabilities in relation thereto as if they were citizens of the United States and residents of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2209.

2-3-110. Agricultural land used for nonfarming purposes and mineral leases.

The restrictions set forth in this chapter do not apply to agricultural land acquired by a foreign party for immediate or potential use for nonfarming purposes.

A foreign party who acquires agricultural land for nonfarming purposes shall not be required to make a filing or report under this chapter.

A foreign party who acquires agricultural land under subsection (a) of this section and later uses the agricultural land for farming purposes shall register as required in this chapter within sixty (60) days of the change in use.

Failure to register ownership for the use of agricultural land for farming purposes under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be subject to actions as provided in §§ 2-3-106 and 2-3-107.

The restrictions set forth in this chapter do not apply and no reporting requirement attaches to leases or other conveyances granting the right to explore for and produce the oil, gas, and all other minerals, including coal, lignite, brine, and all minerals known and recognized as commercial minerals underlying the land, and oil, gas, coal, lignite, brine, and other mineral or royalty interests regardless of type or duration, easements, or tracts of land reasonably necessary for the extraction of oil, gas, and all other minerals, including coal, lignite, brine, and all minerals known and recognized as commercial minerals underlying the land.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 643, § 2, provided: “This act applies retroactively to April 19, 1979.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (b), deleted (b)(2), which read: “The filings shall be made within sixty (60) days of the date of transfer of title to the land”, redesignated the remaining text, and substituted “not be required to make a filing or report under this chapter” for “file with the Secretary of State a declaration of intent as to the intended use of the land, the foreign party's identity, and a legal description of the land acquired”; rewrote (c); and made minor stylistic changes.

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 301, § 10: Mar. 3, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under certain circumstances, an agricultural facility or the operation thereof may be declared a nuisance as a result of change in conditions in the area around the facility occurring after the facility has been in operation for a long period of time; that to permit any such facility which was not a nuisance when established to be declared a nuisance and forced to cease operations because of change in conditions in the locality and after the facility has been in operation for a long period of time is not only unfair to the owners, operators and employees of such plant but is highly detrimental to the economic growth and development of the state; that this act is designed to correct this situation and at the same time to protect the public health and preserve individual rights. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Ark. L. Notes.

Malone, Farmland Preservation, 1985 Ark. L. Notes 73.

Ark. L. Rev.

Noble and Looney, The Emerging Legal Framework for Animal Agricultural Waste Management in Arkansas, 47 Ark. L. Rev. 159.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Property, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 607.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 1096, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2210; Acts 2009, No. 643, §§ 1, 2.